District of Columbia statutes.
16-2365

Termination decrees of other jurisdictions.

If the parent and child relationship has been terminated by judicial decree in another jurisdiction that decree, unless it is against the public policy of the District of Columbia, shall have the same force and effect in the District of Columbia as to matters within the jurisdiction of the District of Columbia court.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 410, 24 DCR 3341
1981 Ed., § 16-2365.
1973 Ed., § 16-2365.